Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-2216.01
Real property associate, defined.

Real property associate means a person who holds a valid credential as a real property associate issued under the Real Property Appraiser Act and:

(1) Who performs valuation services pursuant to subsection (3) of section 76-2227.01;

(2) Who advertises or holds himself or herself out to the general public as a real property associate; or

(3) Who offers, attempts, or agrees to perform or performs valuation services pursuant to subsection (3) of section 76-2227.01.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 31.